Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-184
Sale only in original package; refilling forbidden; exception.

No person except a manufacturer or wholesaler shall fill or refill, in whole or in part, any original package of alcoholic liquor with the same or any other kind or quality of alcoholic liquor. It shall be unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession for sale at retail any bottles, casks, or other containers containing alcoholic liquor except in original packages. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the refilling of original packages of alcoholic liquor for strictly private use and not for resale.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 41, p. 401;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-341;

R.S.1943, § 53-184;

Laws 1991, LB 124, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 65.